Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 9 DIRECTORS - ORGANIZATION OF BOARD
32-1-911. Resignation - vacancy filled - election - ballot - nomination.

If the director sought to be recalled resigns by submitting a written letter of resignation to the designated election official at any time prior to the recall election, all recall proceedings must be terminated, and the vacancy caused by such resignation must be filled as provided by section 32-1-905 (2)(a). If the director resigns after the ballots have been prepared or at a time when it would otherwise be impracticable to remove the recall question from the ballot, votes cast on the recall question shall not be counted. If there are no other issues to be voted on at such election, the recall election must be canceled and notice provided as set forth in section 1-13.5-513 (6).

Unless the designated election official receives a resignation from the director sought to be recalled in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the designated election official shall give notice of the election and the recall question substantially in compliance with section 1-13.5-502 at least twenty days before the election.

The official ballot for a recall election must include the statement of the grounds on which the recall is sought, as included in the recall petition in accordance with section 32-1-909 (4)(c). The director sought to be recalled may submit to the designated election official on or before the date on which the ballot content must be certified under section 1-13.5-511 or 1-5-203 (3), as applicable, a statement of not more than three hundred words in support of the director's retention. The director shall not include any profane or false statement in the statement in support of his or her retention. The official ballot must include the director's statement if the statement is submitted on or before the date of the certification of the ballot.

The official ballot must include, for every director whose recall is to be voted on, the words: "Shall (name of director sought to be recalled) be recalled from the office of director of (name of special district)?". Following or to the right of the question must be the words "Yes" and "No" with a blank space or box to the right of each in which the eligible elector may indicate his or her vote for or against such recall.

Following each recall question as described in subsection (3)(b) of this section, the official ballot must include the names of those persons who have been nominated as candidates in accordance with subsection (4) of this section to succeed the director sought to be recalled. The name of the director sought to be recalled must not appear on the ballot as a candidate for the office. The position of candidate names on the ballot shall be determined by lot in accordance with section 1-13.5-902 (2).

Candidates to succeed the director sought to be recalled at a recall election must be nominated in accordance with section 1-13.5-303 or section 1-13.5-305. Self nominations must be filed no later than sixty-four days prior to the recall election. Affidavits of intent to be a write-in candidate must be filed no later than sixty-one days prior to the recall election. If the election is being conducted by a county clerk and recorder, self-nomination and affidavit of intent forms must be filed in accordance with the successor candidate deadlines as stated in article 12 of title 1. The designated election official may provide a call for nominations in accordance with section 1-13.5-501 (1).

The designated election official shall make absentee ballots available no later than three business days after the board fixes the date for the recall election. An application for an absentee ballot must be filed with the designated election official no later than the Tuesday immediately preceding the recall election.

If a majority of those voting on the question of the recall of a director vote "No", the director shall continue in office. If a majority vote "Yes", the director shall be removed from office upon compliance with section 32-1-901 by his or her successor.

If the vote in a recall election recalls the incumbent director, the candidate who has received the highest number of votes for the vacated office shall be declared elected to serve the remainder of the term of office. The canvassing board or the designated election official shall promptly issue a certificate of election to the director-elect. If the person who received the highest number of votes fails to comply with section 32-1-901 within thirty days after the issuance of a certificate of election, or in the event no person sought election, the office is deemed vacant and must be filled in accordance with section 32-1-905 (2)(a).

Mandatory or optional recounts of ballots in a recall election must be conducted in accordance with section 1-13.5-1306.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1304, § 3, effective May 4.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1672, § 82, effective June 21.

32-1-912. Incumbent not recalled - reimbursement - definition.

If at any recall election the director whose recall is sought is not recalled, or if the hearing officer determines that a recall petition is not sufficient after a protest, the special district may reimburse the director sought to be recalled for his or her actual reasonable expenses.

A director sought to be recalled who requests reimbursement shall file a written request for reimbursement with the board of the special district. The request must include the date, amount, proof of payment, and purpose for each expense for which the director is requesting reimbursement. The board shall review the request and determine whether the expenses are reasonable expenses under subsection (3) of this section and whether to reimburse such expenses. If the special district determines to reimburse the submitted expenses, the special district shall issue payment within forty-five days of the receipt of the request.

For purposes of this section, "reasonable expenses" include, but are not limited to, money spent challenging the sufficiency of the recall petition and in presenting to the eligible electors the official position of the director sought to be recalled, including campaign literature.

"Reasonable expenses" do not include:

Money spent on challenges and court actions that are frivolous or are not related to the sufficiency of the recall petition;

Personal expenses for meals, lodging, and travel costs for the director sought to be recalled;

The costs of maintaining a campaign staff;

Reimbursement for expenses incurred by a campaign committee that has solicited contributions;

Reimbursement of any kind for employees in the director's office; and

All expenses incurred prior to the filing of the recall petition.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1305, § 3, effective May 4.

32-1-913. Second recall petition.

After one recall petition and election, no further petition shall be filed against the same director during the term for which the director was elected unless such a petition is signed by more than fifty percent of the eligible electors of the district.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1306, § 3, effective May 4.

32-1-914. Powers of designated election official and county clerk and recorder.

The designated election official shall render all interpretations and shall make all initial decisions as to controversies or other matters arising out of the operation of a recall election.

All powers and authority granted to the designated election official by this article 1 may be exercised by the county clerk and recorder in the absence of the designated election official or in the event the designated election official for any reason is unable to perform the duties of the designated election official.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1306, § 3, effective May 4.

32-1-915. Costs of recall.

The special district shall promptly pay the costs of the recall election, including the reasonable costs of the county clerk and recorder and designated election official, including but not limited to the costs of staff time, consultants, printing, and publication.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1268), ch. 200, p. 1306, § 3, effective May 4.